test/src/gt-norm-yamls/verb-itahw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  foma:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.foma
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.foma
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - itahw - ok : # -m animate noun, net AEW NA2
    Verb+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatSg1+itahw+Habitual: wakitahs
    Verb+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatSg2+itahw+Habitual: sentahs
    Verb+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatSg3Mal+itahw+Habitual: rotahs
    Verb+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatSg3Fem+itahw+Habitual: yakotahs
    Verb+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatSg3Neuter+itahw+Habitual: yotahs
    Verb+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatDu21+itahw+Habitual: yonkenitahs
    Verb+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatDu31+itahw+Habitual: yonkenitahs
    Verb+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatDu3+itahw+Habitual: rotitahs
    Verb+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatDu3Fem+itahw+Habitual: yotitahs
    Verb+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatPl2Sg1+itahw+Habitual: yonkwaitahs
    Verb+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatPl3Sg1+itahw+Habitual: yonkwaitahs
    Verb+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatPl2+itahw+Habitual: sewenitahs
    Verb+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatPl3+itahw+Habitual: rotitahs
    Verb+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatPl3Fem+itahw+Habitual: yotitahs
    Verb+DefPast+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatSg1+itahw+Punct: wa'wakitahwe'
    Verb+DefPast+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatSg2+itahw+Punct: wa'sentahwe'
    Verb+DefPast+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatSg3Mal+itahw+Punct: wa'rotahwe'
    Verb+DefPast+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatSg3Fem+itahw+Punct: wa'yakotahwe'
    Verb+DefPast+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatSg3Neuter+itahw+Punct: wa'yotahwe'
    Verb+DefPast+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatDu21+itahw+Punct: wa'yonkenitahwe'
    Verb+DefPast+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatDu31+itahw+Punct: wa'yonkenitahwe'
    Verb+DefPast+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatDu3+itahw+Punct: wa'rotitahwe'
    Verb+DefPast+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatDu3Fem+itahw+Punct: wa'yotitahwe'
    Verb+DefPast+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatPl2Sg1+itahw+Punct: wa'yonkwaitahwe'
    Verb+DefPast+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatPl3Sg1+itahw+Punct: wa'yonkwaitahwe'
    Verb+DefPast+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatPl2+itahw+Punct: wa'sewenitahwe'
    Verb+DefPast+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatPl3+itahw+Punct: wa'rotitahwe'
    Verb+DefPast+Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+PatPl3Fem+itahw+Punct: wa'yotitahwe'
     
